Utah statutes.
7-1-208.3.   Supervisor of money services businesses.

(1)  The commissioner shall designate an examiner as supervisor of money services businesses who shall be sufficiently qualified by training and experience in the business of money services businesses or other financial institutions or as an employee of a state or federal agency supervising financial institutions to perform the duties of the office.

(2) (a)  The supervisor of money services businesses is responsible, subject to the direction and control of the commissioner, for the general supervision and examination of money services businesses subject to the jurisdiction of the department and other institutions as assigned.

(b)  The supervisor shall:

(i)  assist and advise the commissioner in the execution of the laws of this state relating to money services businesses; and

(ii)  perform other duties prescribed in this title or assigned by the commissioner.



Enacted by Chapter 73, 2013 General Session

